Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3703
Nebraska Statewide Workforce and Education Reporting System.

The Nebraska Statewide Workforce and Education Reporting System allows Nebraska to:

(1) Provide workforce-outcomes data to postsecondary institutions to guide program, educator, and institutional improvement;

(2) Support students and parents in understanding what education, training, and career pathways best prepare students for occupational success;

(3) Provide comprehensive data about student success and workforce outcomes to policymakers to inform decisions and resource allocation;

(4) Track workforce outcomes in order to better align programs with demands in the labor market;

(5) Disaggregate student outcomes by race, ethnicity, gender, and economic status in order to identify and close educational attainment gaps; and

(6) Identify the long-term return on investment from early education programs.

Laws 2020, LB1160, § 3.